sv: Slutlig form: Ekollon; Boll; Spjut; Annat
zh-CN: 最终形状: 橡子; 球型; 矛; 其他
pl: Ostateczny kształt: Żołędzie; Kula; Grot; Pozostałe
tr: Çatı dekorasyonu şekli: Meşe palamudu; Küresel (Ball); Mızrak; Diğer
zh-TW: 頂飾形狀: 橡子; 球; 矛; 其他
el: Σχήμα τελειώματος: Βελανίδι; Μπάλα; Δόρυ; Άλλο
nl: Kruisbloemvorm: Eikel; Bal; Speer; Andere
ko: 최종 모양: 도토리; 공; 창; 기타
bg-BG: Форма на завършващата част: Жълъд; Топка; Копие; Други
ru: Форма шпиля или наконечника: Желудь; Шар; Копье; Другой
nb: Finialform: Eikenøtt; Ball; Spyd; Annen
da: Endelig form: Agern; Kugle; Spyd; Andet
cs: Tvar ozdobné hlavice: Žalud; Kulová; Kopí; Jiné
ro-RO: Formă ornament: Ghindă; Sferă; Suliță; Altele
fr: Forme du fleuron: Gland; Balle; Lance; Autre
en: Finial shape: Acorn; Ball; Spear; Other
it: Forma della decorazione: Ghianda; Sfera; Lancia; Altro
sl-SI: Oblika okrasne konice: Želod; Krogla; Kopje; Drugo
pt-PT: Formato do remate: Bolota; Bola; Lança; Outro
fi: Päätykoristeen muoto: Tammenterho; Pallo; Keihäs; Muu
th: รูปทรงของส่วนยอด: ลูกโอ๊ก; ทรงกลม; หอก; อื่นๆ
es: Forma final: Bellota; Bola; Lanza; Otros
sk-SK: Tvar ornamentu: Žaluď; Lopta; Oštep; Iné
ja: 最終形状: ドングリ; ボール; 槍; その他
pt-BR: Forma da haste de fixação: Bolota; Tipo esfera; Lança; Outro
hr-HR: Oblik finijala: Žir; Lopta; Koplje; Ostalo
hu: Csúcsdísz alakja: Makk; Gömb; Lándzsa; Egyéb
de: Dachschmuckform: Eichelförmig; Ball; Speer; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Galutinė forma: Gilė; Apvali; Ietis; Kita
vi: Hình dạng cuối cùng: Hạt sồi; Đầu củ tròn; Thương; Khác